dictsource/yue_rules
// Cantonese Chinese

// condition ?1   Speak English letters as English words
// condition ?2   Speak English letter as jyutping romanisation

//voice=zh-yue    // to find the voice for this dictionary

.group a
?1        a        _^_EN
?2        a        a
?2        ai       ai
?2        au       au
?2        aa       aa
?2        aai      aai
?2        aau      aau 
?2        aang     aang

.group b
?1        b        _^_EN
?2        b        b

.group c
?1        c        _^_EN
?2        c        c
?2        ch       tS

.group d
?1        d        _^_EN
?2        d        d

.group e
?1        e        _^_EN
?2        e        e
?2        ei       ei
?2        eu       eu
?2        eo       eo
?2        eoi      eoi

.group f
?1        f        _^_EN
?2        f        f

.group g
?1        g        _^_EN
?2        g        g

.group h
?1        h        _^_EN
?2        h        h

.group i
?1        i        _^_EN
?2        i        i
?2        iu       iu

.group j
?1        j        _^_EN
?2        j        j

.group k
?1        k        _^_EN
?2        k        k

.group l
?1        l        _^_EN
?2        l        l

.group m
?1        m        _^_EN
?2        m        m

.group n
?1        n        _^_EN
?2        n        n
?2        ng       N

.group o
?1        o        _^_EN
?2        o        o
?2        oi       oi
?2        ou       ou
?2        oe       oe
?2        ong      ong

.group p
?1        p        _^_EN
?2        p        p

.group q
?1        q        _^_EN
?2        q        k
?2        qu       kw

.group r
?1        r        _^_EN
?2        r        r

.group s
?1        s        _^_EN
?2        s        s

.group t
?1        t        _^_EN
?2        t        t

.group u
?1        u        _^_EN
?2        u        u
?2        ui       ui

.group v
?1        v        _^_EN
?2        v        v

.group w
?1        w        _^_EN
?2        w        w

.group x
?1        x        _^_EN
?2        x        ks

.group y
?1        y        _^_EN
?2        y        j
?2        yu       yu

.group z
?1        z        _^_EN
?2        z        z

.group
        |        _|
        1        1
        2        2
        3        3
        4        4
        5        5
        6        6
        7        7
